West Virginia, session 2026, HB5117.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. REGISTRATION OF VOTERS. §3-2-2. Eligibility to register to vote. (a) Any person who possesses the constitutional qualifications for voting may register to vote. To be qualified, a person must be a citizen of the United States and a legal resident of West Virginia and of the county where he or she is applying to register, shall be at least eighteen years of age, except that a person who is at least seventeen years of age and who will be eighteen years of age by the time of the next ensuing general election may also be permitted to register, and shall not be otherwise legally disqualified: Provided, That a registered voter who has not reached eighteen years of age may vote both partisan and nonpartisan ballots in a federal, state, county, municipal or special primary election if he or she will be eighteen years of age by the time of the corresponding general election.(b) (1) Any person who has been convicted of a felony, treason, or bribery in an election, under either state or federal law, is disqualified and is not eligible to register or to continue to be registered to vote while serving his or her sentence including any period of incarceration. probation or parole related thereto Any person who has been declared mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction is disqualified and shall not be eligible to register or to continue to be registered to vote for as long as that disability continues.(2) Renewed eligibility to register. - A person otherwise meeting the constitutional and statutory qualifications to vote, who is ineligible to register to vote because of a criminal conviction as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection, is eligible and shall be permitted to register to vote upon any of the following events:(A) The completion of his or her sentence of incarceration;(B) Issuance of an order from a court of competent jurisdiction to vacate or overturn all convictions rendering the person ineligible to register to vote; or(C) Issuance of an order of pardon from the Governor for all convictions rendering the person ineligible to register to vote.(D) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, a person subject to a period of probation or parole shall not be required to wait until completion and that program and shall likewise be eligible to register pursuant to completion of their incarceration, as provided in this subdivision.(3) Notice of renewed eligibility to register. - Upon the occurrence of an event described in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the West Virginia Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall provide the person written notification that he or she is no longer ineligible to register to vote based on his or her conviction and a copy of a voter registration form.(4) Nothing in this subsection may be construed to permit a person to register to vote in an election after the close of voting registration before such election, as provided in §3-2-6 or §3-2-6a, whichever is applicable.